North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 3. Standards of Conduct.

§ 55-8-30.
General standards for directors.

A director shall discharge the director’s duties as a director, including the director’s duties as a member of a committee or subcommittee, in accordance with all of the following:

In good faith.

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging the duties of a director’s office, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by any of the following:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented.

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within their professional or expert competence.

A committee or subcommittee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee or subcommittee merits confidence.

A director is not entitled to the benefit of subsection (b) of this section if the director has actual knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) of this section unwarranted.

A director is not liable for (i) any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if the director performed the duties of the director’s office in compliance with this section or (ii) any failure to offer the corporation the right to have or participate in a business opportunity prior to the pursuit or taking of the opportunity by the director or other person if the corporation’s articles of incorporation include a provision authorized by G.S. 55-2-02(b)(4) and the procedures and approvals required by the provision, if any, were complied with or obtained prior to the pursuit or taking of the opportunity by the director or other person. The duties of a director weighing a change of control situation shall not be any different, nor the standard of care any higher, than otherwise provided in this section.

A director’s personal liability for monetary damages for breach of a duty as a director may be limited or eliminated only to the extent permitted in G.S. 55-2-02(b)(3), and a director may be entitled to indemnification against liability and expenses pursuant to Part 5 of Article 8 of this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 11; 2018-45, s. 10.

§ 55-8-31.
Director conflict of interest.

A conflict of interest transaction is a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction is not voidable by the corporation solely because of the director’s interest in the transaction if any one of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee or subcommittee of the board of directors and the board of directors, or the committee or subcommittee of the board of directors, authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction.

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the shareholders entitled to vote and they authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction.

The transaction was fair to the corporation.

For purposes of this section, a director of the corporation has an indirect interest in a transaction if either of the following is true:

Another entity in which the director has a material financial interest or in which the director is a general partner is a party to the transaction.

Another entity of which the director is a director, officer, or trustee is a party to the transaction and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board of directors (or on the committee or subcommittee) who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction. If a majority of the directors who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve, or ratify the transaction, a quorum is present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of any action taken under subdivision (a)(1) of this section if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved, or ratified as provided in that subdivision.

For purposes of subsection (a)(2), a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the vote of a majority of the shares entitled to be counted under this subsection. Shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and shares owned by or voted under the control of an entity described in subsection (b)(1), may not be counted in a vote of shareholders to determine whether to authorize, approve, or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under subsection (a)(2). The vote of those shares, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this Chapter. A majority of the shares that would if present be entitled to be counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, s. 11; 2018-45, s. 11.

§ 55-8-32.
Loans to directors.

Except as provided by subsection (c), a corporation may not directly or indirectly lend money to or guarantee the obligation of a director of the corporation unless:

The particular loan or guarantee is approved by a majority of the votes represented by the outstanding voting shares of all classes, voting as a single voting group, except the votes of shares owned by or voted under the control of the benefited director; or

The corporation’s board of directors determines that the loan or guarantee benefits the corporation and either approves the specific loan or guarantee or a general plan authorizing loans and guarantees.

The fact that a loan or guarantee is made in violation of this section does not affect the borrower’s liability on the loan.

This section does not apply to loans and guarantees authorized by statute regulating any special class of corporations.

For purposes of this section, a loan or guarantee is made indirectly to or for a director if such director has an indirect interest in the loan or guarantee as defined in G.S. 55-8-31(b).

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 6; 1961, c. 198; 1969, c. 751, s. 9; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-33.
Liability for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of

G.S. 55-6-40

or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating

G.S. 55-6-40

or the articles of incorporation if it is established that he did not perform his duties in compliance with

G.S. 55-8-30

. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

A director held liable under subsection (a) for an unlawful distribution is entitled to:

Contribution from every other director who could be held liable under subsection (a) for the unlawful distribution; and

Reimbursement from each shareholder for the amount the shareholder accepted knowing the distribution was made in violation of

G.S. 55-6-40

or the articles of incorporation.

A proceeding under subsection (a) is barred unless it is commenced within three years after the date on which the effect of the distribution was measured under G.S. 55-6-40(e) or (g).

History.

Code, s. 681; 1901, c. 2, ss. 33, 52; Rev., s. 1192; C.S., s. 1179; 1927, c. 121; 1933, c. 354, s. 1; G.S., s. 55-116; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 35; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is substantially the same as the revised version of the comparable section in the Model Act as published in the November 1986 issue of
The Business Lawyer.
Subsection (b) was modified for greater precision in terminology. The limitation period in subsection (c) was increased to three rather than two years, and the subsection was clarified to ensure that the rights of individual directors to contribution and reimbursement under subsection (b) cannot be cut off before their own liability or lack thereof is determined.

§§ 55-8-34 through 55-8-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.